Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.070

Process—Return—Fees.

Every constable or sheriff serving process or complaint and notice shall return in writing, the time, manner, and place of service and indorse thereon the legal fees therefor and shall sign his or her name to such return, and any person other than one of said officers serving summons or complaint and notice shall file with the justice his or her affidavit, stating the time, place, and manner of the service of such summons or notice and complaint and shall indorse thereon the legal fees therefor.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3005; 1959 c 99 s 1; 1903 c 19 s 2; 1895 c 102 s 2; 1893 c 108 s 2; Code 1881 s 1717; 1873 p 337 s 24; 1860 p 246 s 37; 1854 p 229 s 31; RRS s 1763.]